Idaho statutes. Title 37 FOOD, DRUGS, AND OIL
Chapter 34
SYRINGE AND NEEDLE EXCHANGE ACT

Sec.

§ 37-3401. Short title.

This chapter shall be known and may be cited as the “Syringe and Needle Exchange Act.”

§ 37-3402. Legislative intent.

In adopting this chapter, it is the intent of the legislature to prevent the transmission of disease and to reduce morbidity and mortality among individuals who inject drugs.

§ 37-3403. Definitions.

As used in this chapter:

“Department” means the state department of health and welfare.

“Director” means the director of the department.

“Entity” means:

The department;

A government entity; or

A private organization, whether for profit or nonprofit.

§ 37-3404. Syringe and needle exchange program.

Notwithstanding any provision of law to the contrary:

An entity may operate a syringe and needle exchange program in this state if such entity complies with the provisions of this section and with rules promulgated by the department;

An entity may procure supplies needed to operate a syringe and needle exchange program in this state if such entity complies with the provisions of this section and with rules promulgated by the department; and

An entity may supply a syringe and needle exchange program with materials necessary to operate the program if such entity complies with rules promulgated by the department.

An entity operating a syringe and needle exchange program must:

Facilitate the exchange of used syringes or needles for new syringes or needles in sealed sterile packaging; and

Ensure that the recipient of a new syringe or needle is given verbal and written instruction on:

Methods for preventing the transmission of blood-borne diseases, including hepatitis C and human immunodeficiency virus; and

Options for obtaining:

Services for the treatment of a substance use disorder;

Testing for a blood-borne disease; and

An opioid antagonist pursuant to section 54-1733B, Idaho Code.

An entity operating a syringe and needle exchange program must report annually to the department on the following information about the program:

The number of individuals who have exchanged syringes or needles;

The number of used syringes or needles exchanged for new syringes or needles; and

The number of new syringes or needles provided in exchange for used syringes or needles.

§ 37-3405. Report.

No later than July 1, 2020, and every two (2) years thereafter, the department shall report to the senate and house of representatives health and welfare committees on:

The activities and outcomes of syringe and needle exchange programs operating in the state, including:

The number of individuals who have exchanged syringes or needles;

The number of used syringes or needles exchanged for new syringes or needles;

The number of new syringes or needles provided in exchange for used syringes or needles;

The estimated impact, if any, that the programs have had on blood-borne infection rates; and

The estimated impact, if any, of the programs on the number of individuals receiving treatment for a substance use disorder;

The potential for additional reductions in the number of syringes and needles contaminated with blood-borne disease if the programs receive additional funding;

The potential for additional reductions in state and local government spending if the programs receive additional funding;

Whether the programs promote illicit use of drugs; and

Whether the programs, in the opinion of the director, should be continued, continued with modifications, or terminated.

§ 37-3406. Rules.

The department may promulgate such rules as are necessary to enforce the provisions of this chapter.